Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4331.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; MAXIS AND MEDICAID MANAGEMENT INFORMATION SYSTEM.new text end new text begin (a) $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for information technology improvements to the MAXIS system. Money appropriated under this paragraph must be used to develop and implement a modernization plan or replacement for MAXIS. Improvements must be developed through collaborative planning with counties and Tribal Nations that use MAXIS and must have a direct impact on public assistance casework. The appropriation must not be used for changes to MAXIS that are not part of the modernization plan or for other Department of Human Services or Department of Children, Youth, and Families information technology systems. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (b) $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for information technology improvements to the Medicaid Management Information System (MMIS). Money appropriated under this paragraph must be used to develop and implement a modernization plan or replacement for MMIS. Improvements must be developed through collaborative planning with counties, Tribal Nations, and health plans that use MMIS and must have a direct impact on health care claims and capitation payment processing. The appropriation must not be used for changes to MMIS that are not part of the modernization plan or for other Department of Human Services information technology systems. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end